District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.23

Interim loan authority.

(a)

The Mayor is authorized to accept loans for the District from the Treasury of the United States, and the Secretary is authorized to lend to the Mayor, such sums as the Mayor may determine are required to complete capital projects for which construction and construction services funds have been authorized or appropriated, as the case may be, by Congress prior to October 1, 1983, or the date of the enactment of the appropriation act for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1984, for the government of the District of Columbia, whichever is later. In addition, such loans may include funds to pay the District’s share of the cost of the adopted regional system specified in the National Capital Transportation Act of 1969.

(b)

Loans advanced pursuant to this section during any six-month period shall be at a rate of interest determined by the Secretary as of the beginning of such period, which, in his judgment, would reflect the cost of money to the Treasury for borrowing at a maturity approximately equal to the period of time the loan is outstanding.

(c)

Subject to the limitations contained in § 1-206.03(b), there is authorized to be appropriated to make loans under this section the sum of $155,000,000 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1982, the sum of $155,000,000 for the fiscal year ending on September 30, 1983, and the sum of $155,000,000 for the fiscal year ending on September 30, 1984.

(d)

The authority contained in this section to make loans shall be effective for any fiscal year only to such extent or in such amounts as are provided in appropriations acts.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 779, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 723
Amended, Oct. 13, 1977, 91 Stat. 1155, Pub. L. 95-131, § 1
This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.